en: Frozen baby carrots
de: Tiefkühl-Babykarotten
es: Zanahorias baby congeladas
fr: Baby carottes surgelées, jeunes carottes surgelées
hr: Smrznute mlade mrkve
it: Carote baby surgelate
nl: Diepvries babywortels

en: Frozen chopped carrots
de: Tiefkühl-Karotten in Scheiben
es: Zanahorias troceadas congeladas, Zanahorias en rodajas congeladas
fr: Carottes en rondelles surgelées
hr: Smrznuta nasjeckana mrkva
nl: Diepvries gehakte wortels

en: Frozen cooked carrots
fr: Carottes surgelées cuites

en: Frozen cauliflower florets
de: Tiefkühl-Blumenkohl
es: Coliflores en floretes congeladas, Coliflores congeladas
fi: pakastetut kukkakaalinuput
fr: Choux-fleurs en fleurettes surgelés
hr: Smrznuti cvjetovi cvjetače
it: Cime di cavolfiore surgelate
nl: Diepvries bloemkool

en: Frozen cooked cauliflowers
fr: Choux-fleurs surgelés cuits, Chou-fleur surgelé cuit

en: frozen cauliflowers
fr: Choux-fleurs surgelés, Chou-fleur surgelé

en: Frozen chards
de: Tiefkühl-Mangold
es: Acelgas congeladas
fr: Blettes surgelés
hr: Smrznute blitve
nl: Diepvries snijbiet

en: Frozen chard leaves
de: Tiefkühl-Mangoldblätter
es: Acelgas en hojas congeladas, Acelgas congeladas en hojas
hr: Smrznuti listovi blitve
nl: Diepvries snijbietbladeren

en: Frozen chopped chards
de: Tiefgekühlter gehackter Mangold
es: Acelgas troceadas congeladas, Acelgas congeladas troceadas
hr: Smrznute nasjeckane blitve
nl: Gehakte diepvriessnijbieten

en: Frozen cardoons, Frozen artichoke thistles
es: Cardos congelados
fr: Cardes surgelés, Cardons surgelés
hr: Smrznuti kartoni
nl: Diepvrieskardoen

en: Frozen chopped cardoons, Frozen chopped artichoke thistles
es: Cardos troceados congelados
fr: Cardes hachés surgelés, Cardons hachés surgelés
hr: Smrznuti nasjeckani kartoni
nl: Gehakte diepvrieskardoen

en: Frozen turnips, Frozen turnip
de: Tiefkühl-Rüben
fr: Navets surgelés, navet surgelé
hr: Smrznuta repa
nl: Diepvries knolrapen

en: Frozen onions
bg: Замразен лук
da: Frosne løg
fr: Oignons surgelés
hr: Smrznuti luk
sv: Frysta lökar

en: Frozen chopped onions
da: Frosne hakkede løg
de: Tiefgefrorene gehackte Zwiebeln
es: Cebollas troceadas congeladas, Cebollas congeladas troceadas
fr: Oignons hachés surgelés, Oignons émincés surgelés
hr: Smrznuti nasjeckani luk
nl: Diepvries gehakte uien
sv: Frysta hackade lökar

en: Frozen chopped shallots
da: Frosne hakkede skalotteløg
sv: Frysta hackade schalottenlökar

en: Frozen chopped garlic
de: Tiefgefrorener gehackter Knoblauch
es: Ajos troceados congelados, Ajos congelados troceados
fr: Ail haché surgelé
hr: Smrznuti nasjeckani češnjak
nl: Diepvries gehakte knoflook

en: Frozen green garlics, Frozen green garlic
es: Ajos tiernos congelados, Brotes de ajo congelados
fr: Aillets surgelés
he: שום ירוק קפוא
hr: Smrznuti zeleni češnjak
nl: Diepvries groene knoflook

en: Frozen broad beans, Frozen fresh broad beans, Frozen fresh fava beans, Frozen immature broad beans
es: Habas congeladas, Habas frescas congeladas, Habitas frescas congeladas, Habas inmaduras congeladas, Habitas inmaduras congeladas
fr: Fèves surgelées, Fèves fraîches surgelées, Féverolles frais surgelés
hr: Smrznuti bob
nl: Diepvries tuinbonen

en: Frozen flageolet beans
fr: Haricots flageolets surgelés

en: Frozen green beans, Frozen string beans
de: Gefrorene grüne Bohnen
es: Judías verdes congeladas
fi: pakastetut vihreät pavut
fr: Haricots verts surgelés
hr: Smrznute mahune
it: Fagiolini surgelati
nl: Diepvries sperziebonen